Hawaii statutes.
[§142-99] Lost or rescued animals;
penalty. (a) Except as otherwise provided in section 143-10, any person
who exerts control over a lost animal shall immediately notify the owner of the
animal, if known, or an animal control officer of the local humane society
chapter of the county in which the animal is found and release the animal to
the owner, animal control officer, or humane society chapter. For purposes of
this section, "exert control" means any act which constrains an
animal including leashing, chaining, or otherwise confining an animal.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be fined not more than $500. [L 1991, c 226, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next